Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2709
Title and abbreviation; use.

No person shall use the title Perfusionist, the abbreviation LP, or any other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviations, or insignia indicating the practice of perfusion unless licensed to practice perfusion.

Laws 2007, LB236, § 16;

R.S.Supp.,2007, § 71-1,398.